Minnesota, session 2025-2026, SF3353.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MINNESOTA: Section 1. new text begin PILOT PROGRAM TO REDUCE TRAUMA FROM GUN VIOLENCE.new text end new text begin Subdivision 1. new text end new text begin Pilot program. new text end new text begin (a) The commissioner of health shall establish a pilot program to aid in reducing trauma resulting from gun violence and to address the root causes of gun violence. The pilot program shall consist of the following components: new text end new text begin (1) investing in community-based organizations that work with individuals at high risk of experiencing gun violence or individuals experiencing trauma from gun violence to allow the organizations to receive healing services and training on new, innovative practices or evidence-based practices to address gun violence and trauma from gun violence; new text end new text begin (2) establishing and supporting the provision of stabilization services to families experiencing trauma from gun violence by training community members to serve as trauma navigators. Trauma navigators must be trained to use trauma-informed care and holistic treatment modalities to provide support to families experiencing trauma from gun violence and must help these families access resources needed for stabilization after gun violence occurs, including but not limited to child care, housing, mental health and physical health services, economic support, and education; new text end new text begin (3) supporting reintegration services to educate families about alternative ways to respond to gun violence, including educating families about self-advocacy, reintegrating into the community, maintaining healthy relationships, and obtaining professional services necessary for healing; and new text end new text begin (4) developing and implementing education campaigns and outreach materials that use nonviolent language to educate communities, families, organizations, and the public about the relationship between gun violence and trauma. Campaigns and materials must be culturally appropriate for the community being served and must be provided in languages other than English for those with a non-English language preference. new text end new text begin (b) The commissioner may enter into contractual agreements with or provide grants to community-based organizations or to community members, who have experienced gun violence and have demonstrated healing in the community, to perform any of the activities under this section. new text end new text begin Subd. 2. new text end new text begin Program guidelines and protocols; advisory panel. new text end new text begin (a) The commissioner, with advice from an advisory panel established under paragraph (b), shall develop program guidelines and protocols for: new text end new text begin (1) resources and training for professionals who encounter individuals who have perpetrated or been impacted by gun violence; new text end new text begin (2) necessary responses to gun violence by local units of governments and state government; and new text end new text begin (3) methods of informing affected communities and local units of governments representing those communities on effective strategies to target community, domestic, and other forms of gun violence. new text end new text begin (b) The commissioner shall convene an advisory panel to provide advice to the commissioner on the development of program guidelines and protocols under paragraph (a), review and provide input on pilot program activities and the results of the pilot program, and communicate with community members about issues related to gun violence and trauma from gun violence. The advisory panel shall consist of ten members who have a background in or skills in one or more of the following areas: working with people who have experienced trauma, trauma-informed care, trauma-informed nutrition, healing, motivational interviewing, financial skills, and the ability to access resources. Individuals interested in serving on the advisory panel must apply to the commissioner in a time and manner specified by the commissioner. The advisory panel shall meet at least monthly, and advisory panel members shall receive compensation and reimbursement for expenses according to Minnesota Statutes, section 15.059, subdivision 3. new text end new text begin Subd. 3. new text end new text begin Report. new text end new text begin By February 1, 2027, the commissioner shall submit a report on the progress of the pilot program in reducing trauma from gun violence and addressing the root causes of gun violence to the chairs and ranking minority members of the legislative committees with jurisdiction over health and public safety. new text end Sec. 2. new text begin APPROPRIATION; PILOT PROGRAM TO REDUCE TRAUMA FROM GUN VIOLENCE.new text end new text begin $5,000,000 in fiscal year 2026 is appropriated from the general fund to the commissioner of health for the pilot program to reduce trauma from gun violence. This appropriation is available until June 30, 2028. new text end